Wyoming, session 2026, HB0062.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-118(a)(i) and (ii) and
1-42-202(e)(ii) are amended to read:

1-39-118. Maximum liability; insurance authorized.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, in any action under this act, the liability of the
HB0062

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0327
governmental entity, including a public employee while
acting within the scope of his duties, shall not exceed:

(i) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000.00) one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)
to any claimant for any number of claims arising out of a
single transaction or occurrence. The maximum liability
under this paragraph shall be adjusted for inflation
annually by the general services division of the department
of administration and information, using the consumer price
index or its successor index of the United States
department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, or three
percent (3%), whichever is less; or

(ii) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000.00) two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) for all
claims of all claimants arising out of a single transaction
or occurrence. The maximum liability under this paragraph
shall be adjusted for inflation annually by the general
services division of the department of administration and
information, using the consumer price index or its
successor index of the United States department of labor,
HB0062

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0327
bureau of labor statistics, or three percent (3%),
whichever is less.

1-42-202. Local government self-insurance program;
creation; authorized payments.

(e) For any claim brought under the Wyoming
Governmental Claims Act the program shall be limited in
liability to payment of no more than the amounts specified
in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection.
Participating local governments shall be responsible for
the amount of any adjudicated claims and expenses in excess
of:

(ii) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00)
For any other claim brought under the Wyoming Governmental
Claims Act, for any one (1) occurrence plus loss adjustment
expenses the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) to
any claimant for any number of claims arising out of a
single transaction or occurrence and the sum of two million
dollars ($2,000,000.00) for all claims of all claimants
arising out of a single transaction or occurrence. The
maximum liability amounts specified under this paragraph
HB0062

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0327
shall be adjusted for inflation annually by the general
services division of the department of administration and
information, using the consumer price index or its
successor index of the United States department of labor,
bureau of labor statistics, or three percent (3%),
whichever is less.

Section 2. This act applies to all claims under the
Wyoming Governmental Claims Act that are based upon a
transaction or occurrence that occurs on and after July 1,
2026. For purposes of this section, a "transaction" or
"occurrence" includes an act, error or omission.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0062